Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
In General

§ 57-29-1.
Vacation guide; definitions.

As used in this section and Section 57-29-3, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings herein ascribed to them unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Vacation Guide” shall mean a publication, compiled, edited and published by the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, distributed free to the members of the general public and containing no advertising and no photographs or listings of public officials.

“Board” shall mean the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board or any successor agency that may be designated by law to succeed to the duties of the agricultural and industrial board with respect to the promotion of tourist travel and vacation business in Mississippi.

“Publication agency” shall mean any printer, photographer, publication designer, binder, or copywriter or any agency whose technical, production or supply services are a prerequisite to the support of the above functions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 344, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1974).

§ 57-29-3.
Vacation guide; publication.

The travel and tourism department of the board is hereby authorized, upon approval of the board, to solicit bids from competent publication agencies and to expend such funds as may be appropriated for the purpose of publishing a vacation guide.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 344, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1974).